Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 33 Receivers

Cross references. —

As to fiduciaries generally, see title 4.

As to receivers generally, see Rule 66, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

65 Am. Jur. 2d Receivers § 1 et seq.

75 C.J.S. Receivers § 1 et seq.

§ 1-33-101.
Cases in which receiver appointed.

A receiver may be appointed by the district court in the following actions or cases:

By a vendor to vacate a fraudulent purchase of property;

By a creditor to subject any property or fund to his claim;

By a partner or other person jointly owning or interested in any property or fund, whose right to or interest in the property or fund or the proceeds thereof is probable and where it is shown that the property or fund is in danger of being lost, removed or materially injured;

By a mortgagee for the foreclosure of his mortgage and sale of mortgaged property where it appears that the mortgaged property is in danger of being lost, removed or materially injured, or that a condition of the mortgage has not been performed and the property is probably insufficient to discharge the mortgage debt;

After judgment to carry the judgment into effect;

After judgment to dispose of the property according to the judgment or preserve it during the pendency of an appeal, or when an execution has been returned unsatisfied and the judgment debtor refuses to apply the property in satisfaction of the judgment;

When a corporation has been dissolved or is insolvent or in imminent danger of insolvency or has forfeited its corporate rights; and

In all other cases where receivers have been appointed by courts of equity.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 587; R.S. 1887, § 2935; R.S. 1899, § 4054; C.S. 1910, § 4914; C.S. 1920, § 6184; R.S. 1931, § 89-3601; C.S. 1945, § 3-7301; W.S. 1957, § 1-990; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-34-101

.

Cross references. —

As to receivership in connection with property attached prior to judgment, see §§

1-15-201

to

1-15-205

.

As to proceedings in aid of execution, see §§

1-17-412

and

1-17-413

.

As to liquidation of banks, see §§

13-4-301

and

13-4-302

.

As to liquidation of savings and loan associations, see §

13-6-405

.

As to liquidation of foreign building and loan associations, see §

13-8-202

.

As to appointment and qualification of receiver to liquidate corporations, see §

26-28-106

.

As to receivership in regard to University Securities Law, see §

21-17-430

.

As to receivership in regard to multilevel or pyramid distributorship, see §§

40-3-118

and

40-3-119

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Notice. —

As general rule, receiver should not be appointed until after notice to defendant or other interested parties. O'Donnell v. First Nat'l Bank, 9 Wyo. 408, 64 P. 337,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1901).

Party affected by personal judgment entitled to opportunity
to be heard. —

A party to be affected by a personal judgment must have his day in court or an opportunity to be heard. Barber v. Barber, 349 P.2d 198,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1960), citing, L. C. Jones Trucking Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 68 Wyo. 384, 234 P.2d 802,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1951).

And determination of cause without hearing is fatal. —

Where the principles of natural justice demand that rights not be affected without an opportunity to be heard, then notwithstanding the silence of this section, courts will not proceed to an adjudication without notice and hearing, and determination of the cause without a hearing is fatal. Barber v. Barber, 349 P.2d 198,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1960), citing, Barrett v. Oakley, 40 Wyo. 449, 278 P. 538,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1929).

And hearing must be before confirmation of receivers' report.
—

Where there is a serious question as to the adherence by the receivers to the authority granted them by the court's appointment, the hearing to be effective must be before confirmation and not afterward, since ordinarily the confirmation of a judicial sale by a court of competent jurisdiction cures all irregularities in the proceedings leading up to or in the conduct of the sale, and courts are reluctant to disturb sales which have been confirmed. Barber v. Barber, 349 P.2d 198,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1960).

Discretion of court. —

Appointment of receiver pendente lite rests to considerable extent in discretion of the court, and the probability that plaintiff will finally be entitled to a decree is a material circumstance to be considered, under this section. Barrett v. Green River & Rock Springs Live Stock Co., 28 Wyo. 379, 205 P. 742,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1922).

Other grounds. —

Receiver will be appointed where other grounds in addition to insolvency make preservation of property for creditors necessary. State ex rel. Avenius v. Tidball, 35 Wyo. 496, 252 P. 499,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1927).

Abandonment of corporate affairs. —

Petition alleging abandonment of corporate affairs by officers and probability of loss by depreciation of assets warranted appointment of receiver. Stockmen's Nat'l Bank v. Calloway Shops, 41 Wyo. 232, 285 P. 146,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1930).

Judgment creditor's right. —

Judgment creditor may have receiver appointed against debtor corporation, though resulting in its dissolution. State ex rel. Avenius v. Tidball, 35 Wyo. 496, 252 P. 499,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1927).

Judgment creditor may have receiver appointed to take over judgment debtor's property to enforce judgment. State ex rel. Avenius v. Tidball, 35 Wyo. 496, 252 P. 499,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1927).

Mortgage foreclosure. —

In mortgage foreclosure action receiver may be appointed of rents and profits of mortgaged property where it appears property is in danger of being lost, removed, or materially injured, or condition of mortgage has not been performed and property is probably insufficient to discharge the debt. Anderson v. Matthews, 8 Wyo. 513, 58 P. 898,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1899).

Receiver may be appointed in mortgage foreclosure without showing person liable for indebtedness was insolvent. Grieve v. Huber, 38 Wyo. 223, 266 P. 128,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 41 Wyo. 168, 283 P. 1105,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1930).

Mortgagor's rights. —

Under this section and §

1-33-104

, appointment of receiver during period of redemption does not constitute an invasion of mortgagor's constitutional rights, since mortgagor's right of possession during such period is conditional. Grieve v. Huber, 38 Wyo. 223, 266 P. 128,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1928), reh'g denied, 41 Wyo. 168, 283 P. 1105,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1930).

Order of confirmation. —

Where order appointing a receiver in suit to foreclose second mortgage, and directing him to pay the rents and profits to the second mortgagee, and the acts of the receiver in pursuance thereof, are confirmed after first mortgagee has appeared and asked appointment of a receiver, the order of confirmation is conclusive on the first mortgagee and his privies, though the original appointment of the receiver was invalid, and thereafter the order is a complete defense to an action by first mortgagee or his privies to recover rents and profits collected by receiver prior to confirmation order. Anderson v. Riddle, 10 Wyo. 277, 68 P. 829,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1902).

Stated

in

Kirby Royalties, Inc. v. Texaco, Inc., 458 P.2d 101,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1969).

Cited

in

Johnson v. Smith, 455 P.2d 244,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1969).

Law reviews. —

See “Collecting Money Judgments in Wyoming,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 159.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Inspection of corporate books and records by a stockholder for purpose of determining advisability of receivership, 15 ALR2d 11.

Appointment or discharge of receiver for marital or community property necessitated by suit for divorce or separation, 15 ALR4th 224.

§ 1-33-102.
Persons ineligible as receiver; exceptions.

No person interested
in an action shall be appointed receiver or be a representative of
the receiver except by consent of the parties.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 588; R.S. 1887, § 2936; R.S. 1899, § 4055; C.S. 1910, § 4915; Laws 1915, ch. 128, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 6185; R.S. 1931, § 89-3602; C.S. 1945, § 3-7302; W.S. 1957, § 1-991; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-34-102.

The fundamental thought underlying this section

is that no one should act as attorney for the receiver who represents antagonistic interests unless by consent of the parties. State Bd. of Law Examiners v. Goppert, 66 Wyo. 117, 205 P.2d 124,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1949).

An attorney, who represented a receiver, was not guilty of unprofessional conduct

in “coaxing” some of his friends to form a partnership and bid in the assets of the firm in receivership. State Bd. of Law Examiners v. Goppert, 66 Wyo. 117, 205 P.2d 124,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1949).

“No fund” check holder. —

Corporate employee retiring “no fund” check previously given her for salary before qualifying as receiver, was not “creditor” precluding appointment as receiver. Stockmen's Nat'l Bank v. Calloway Shops, 41 Wyo. 232, 285 P. 146,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1930).

Objections to appointment. —

Objection that receiver was wrongfully appointed by reason of this section, on ground that she was creditor, could not be made after receiver had qualified, managed property, and had made final settlement to court. Stockmen's Nat'l Bank v. Calloway Shops, 41 Wyo. 232, 285 P. 146,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1930).

Receiver's interest. —

Bank receiver could not be removed on ground of interest, where some of intervening depositors seeking removal consented to appointment; it not appearing which interveners withheld consent. State ex rel. Howell v. Bank of Glenrock, 36 Wyo. 125, 253 P. 665,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1927).

§ 1-33-103.
Oath and bond of receiver.

Before he enters upon
his duties the receiver must be sworn to perform faithfully and give
surety approved by the court, or by the clerk upon order of the court,
in such sum as the court shall direct not to exceed double the amount
of any property involved, conditioned that he will faithfully discharge
the duties of receiver and obey the orders of the court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 589; R.S. 1887, § 2937; Laws 1895, ch. 12, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4056; C.S. 1910, § 4916; C.S. 1920, § 6186; R.S. 1931, § 89-3603; C.S. 1945, § 3-7303; W.S. 1957, § 1-992; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-34-103.

Appointment not effective until receiver qualifies and posts
bond. —

Although an order appointing a receiver is entered, the appointment is not effective until he qualifies and posts bond as required by order of the court. Krist v. Aetna Casualty & Sur., 667 P.2d 665,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 349

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 1-33-104.
Powers of receiver.

The receiver under control
of the court, may bring and defend actions in his own name as receiver,
take and keep possession of the property, receive rents, collect,
compound for and compromise demands, make transfers and generally
do acts respecting the property as the court may authorize.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 590; R.S. 1887, § 2938; R.S. 1899, § 4057; C.S. 1910, § 4917; C.S. 1920, § 6187; R.S. 1931, § 89-3604; C.S. 1945, § 3-7304; W.S. 1957, § 1-993; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-34-104.

Receiver is an officer and arm of the court

and acts under the direction and supervision of the court. The receiver's duties require that he keep separate, accurate records of receipts and disbursements and all business of the receivership, that he take possession of and keep and preserve receivership property, and that he report to the court, account, and obey orders of the court. Krist v. Aetna Casualty & Sur., 667 P.2d 665,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 349

(Wyo. 1983).

Extension of receivership. —

Under this section, where a junior mortgagee has made proper showing, and secured receivership for his benefit, and a senior mortgagee, a party in the former's foreclosure suit, subsequently makes a similar showing, receivership will be extended to protect right of senior mortgagee to rents accruing after his application for receiver. Anderson v. Matthews, 8 Wyo. 513, 58 P. 898,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1899).

Burden on receiver to prove accounting, while burden on claimant
to prove claim. —

Where the receiver files an account with the court, the burden of proof is upon the receiver to prove that accounting. One who asserts a charge or a counterclaim against the receiver or the receivership estate has the burden of proof as to that claim. Krist v. Aetna Casualty & Sur., 667 P.2d 665,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 349

(Wyo. 1983).

Where receiver steps outside his authority, he is subject to
suit as individual. —

The general rule is that a receiver can neither sue nor be sued without order of the court. Where the receiver steps outside his authority granted to him by the court, he cannot claim the protection of the court and he can be sued as an individual. Krist v. Aetna Casualty & Sur., 667 P.2d 665,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 349

(Wyo. 1983).

Receiver's compensation addressed to sound discretion of trial
court. —

The allowance of compensation to a receiver and his attorney is a matter addressed to the sound discretion of the trial court. This is because the receiver acts under the authority of the court and is considered to be an officer of the court. The court supervises him, knows his circumstances, the services rendered by him, the amount of time he has expended and what is reasonable, and can judge the value of those services. Krist v. Aetna Casualty & Sur., 667 P.2d 665,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 349

(Wyo. 1983).

And receiver who is also creditor may recover fees and expenses.
—

There is no general rule that a receiver who is also a creditor cannot recover reasonable fees and expenses for acting as a receiver. Krist v. Aetna Casualty & Sur., 667 P.2d 665,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 349

(Wyo. 1983).

Applied

in

Barber v. Barber, 349 P.2d 198,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1960).

Cited

in

Grieve v. Huber, 38 Wyo. 223, 266 P. 128,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1928).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Federal receivers of property in different districts under 28 USCS § 754, 57 ALR Fed 621.

§ 1-33-105.
Investment of funds by receiver.

Funds in the hands of
a receiver may be invested upon interest by order of the court with
the consent of all parties to the action.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 591; R.S. 1887, § 2939; R.S. 1899, § 4058; C.S. 1910, § 4918; C.S. 1920, § 6188; R.S. 1931, § 89-3605; C.S. 1945, § 3-7305; W.S. 1957, § 1-994; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-34-105.

§ 1-33-106.
Disposition of trust property during litigation.

When a party admits he
has in his possession or under his control any money or other thing
capable of delivery which is the subject of the litigation, held by
him as trustee for another party or which belongs or is due to another
party, the court may order the same to be deposited in court or delivered
to the other party with or without security, subject to further direction
of the court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 592; R.S. 1887, § 2940; R.S. 1899, § 4059; C.S. 1910, § 4919; C.S. 1920, § 6189; R.S. 1931, § 89-3606; C.S. 1945, § 3-7306; W.S. 1957, § 1-995; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-34-106.

§ 1-33-107.
Enforcement of orders of court.

When a court orders the
deposit or delivery of money or other thing and the order is disobeyed,
the court, besides punishing the disobedience as for contempt, may
order the sheriff to take the money or thing and deposit or deliver
it in conformity with the direction of the court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 593; R.S. 1887, § 2941; R.S. 1899, § 4060; C.S. 1910, § 4920; C.S. 1920, § 6190; R.S. 1931, § 89-3607; C.S. 1945, § 3-7307; W.S. 1957, § 1-996; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-34-107.

§ 1-33-108.
Publication of notice of appointment of receiver; requiring claims
to be presented.

Within thirty (30) days
after a receiver is appointed and qualified if the court so orders,
the receiver shall publish for three (3) weeks in a newspaper of the
county in which he is appointed a notice that he is appointed receiver,
stating the date of the appointment and requiring all persons having
claims against the person, company, corporation or partnership for
which the receiver is appointed to exhibit their claims to the receiver
within the four (4) months from the date of the first publication
of the notice, and if the claims are not exhibited within the four
(4) months they are forever barred from participation in the assets
of the receivership.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 17, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 89-3608; C.S. 1945, § 3-7308; W.S. 1957, § 1-997; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-34-108.

§ 1-33-109.
Publication of notice of appointment of receiver; proof of publication;
procedure when claimant out of state.

After the notice is given
as required, a copy with an affidavit of publication must be filed
in the office of the clerk of court and the court shall enter a decree
that notice to creditors has been duly given and that all claims not
exhibited as required by law are barred. When it appears by affidavit
to the satisfaction of the court that a claimant had no notice by
reason of being out of the state, the claim may upon order of the
court be presented at any time before a decree of final settlement
of the receivership is entered.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 17, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 89-3609; C.S. 1945, § 3-7309; W.S. 1957, § 1-998; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-34-109.

§ 1-33-110.
Time for bringing suit against receiver.

When a properly filed
claim is rejected by the receiver, or if allowed by the receiver is
rejected by the court, the holder of the claim must bring suit against
the receiver within four (4) months after the date upon which he is
given notice of the rejection, otherwise the claim is forever barred.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 29, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 89-3610; C.S. 1945, § 3-7310; W.S. 1957, § 1-999; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-34-110.

Pending cases. —

Section 2, ch. 29, Laws 1925, reads: “This act shall apply to all cases of receivership now pending, excepting only that the holder of any claim rejected previous to the passage of this act, shall have four months from the date upon which this act goes into effect, within which to file suit upon such claims.”

Section 3, ch. 29, Laws 1925, makes the act effective from and after passage. Approved February 12, 1925.